Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB18.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Ammunition" means loaded or unloaded ammunition designed for use in
any firearm; and
(b) "Firearm" means any weapon that will expel a projectile by the action of an
explosive.
(2) (a) Any owner or other person lawfully in possession of a firearm who suffers
the loss or theft of the firearm or any person who sells ammunition who
suffers a loss or theft of ammunition shall report the facts and
circumstances of the loss or theft to an appropriate law enforcement agency
within twenty-four (24) hours of the discovery of the loss or theft.
(b) The report required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall contain, if
known, the caliber, make, model, manufacturer’s name, and serial number,
if any, and any other distinguishing number or identification mark on the
firearm, or the make, type, and caliber of the ammunition.
(3) A law enforcement agency that receives a report pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section shall enter the reported information into the National Crime Information
Center database.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "ammunition" and "firearm" have the same meanings as
in Section 1 of this Act.
(2) Any negligence or willful misconduct of a person shall be imputed to an owner or
other person lawfully in possession of a firearm who fails to report the loss or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 11/12/2025 9:46 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 255
theft of the firearm as required by Section 1 of this Act for civil damages for any
injury to the person of another caused by the use of the lost or stolen firearm. The
owner or other person lawfully in possession of the firearm shall be jointly and
severally liable with the person for damages caused by the person's negligence or
willful misconduct.
(3) Any negligence or willful misconduct of a minor shall be imputed to a person
who knowingly furnishes a firearm to the minor for civil damages for any injury
to the person of another caused by the use of the firearm, and the person shall be
jointly and severally liable with the minor for damages caused by the minor's
negligence or willful misconduct.
(4) Civil liability under this section shall not be limited by any other law that limits
liability of a parent, guardian, or other person legally responsible for a minor.
(5) This section shall not limit any civil or criminal action otherwise provided by law.
Section 3. KRS 411.155 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in Section 2 of this Act, a person or entity shall not be held
liable for damages of any kind resulting from injuries to another person sustained as
a result of the criminal use of any firearm by a third person, unless the person or
entity conspired with the third person to commit, or willfully aided, abetted, or
caused the commission of, the criminal act in which the firearm was used.
(2) This section shall not be construed to negate, limit, or modify the doctrine of
negligence or strict liability relating to abnormally dangerous products or activities
and defective products.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 11/12/2025 9:46 AM Jacketed